Louisiana, session 2026, SB337.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1863 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1867.1 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1863. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Drug Shortage List" means a list of drug products posted on the United
States Food and Drug Administration drug shortage website.
(2) "Effective rate pricing" means any payment reduction for pharmacist or
pharmacy services by a pharmacy benefit manager under a reconciliation process for
direct or indirect remuneration fees, a brand or generic effective rate of
Page 1 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
reimbursement, or any other reduction or aggregate reduction of payment.
(3) "Enrollee" means any individual entitled to coverage of healthcare
services from a health insurance issuer under a health plan.
(3)(4) "Health benefit plan", "health plan", "plan", "benefit", or "health
insurance coverage" means services consisting of medical care provided directly
through insurance, reimbursement, or other means, and including items and services
paid for as medical care under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate,
hospital or medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization contract,
or health maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer.
However, excepted benefits are not included as a "health benefit plan".
(5) "Healthcare service" means an item or service furnished to any
individual for the purpose of preventing, diagnosing, alleviating, curing, or
healing human illness, injury, or physical disability.
(4)(6) "Health insurance issuer" means any entity that offers health insurance
coverage through a plan, policy, or certificate of insurance subject to state law that
regulates the business of insurance. "Health insurance issuer" shall also include a
health maintenance organization, as defined and licensed pursuant to Subpart I of
Part I of Chapter 2 of this Code.
(5)(7) "Local pharmacy" means a pharmacy as defined in the North American
Industry Classification System (NAICS) Code 456110, which is domiciled in
Louisiana and has fewer than ten retail outlets under its corporate umbrella.
(6)(8) "Maximum Allowable Cost List" means a listing of the National Drug
Code used by a pharmacy benefit manager setting the maximum allowable cost on
which reimbursement to a pharmacy or pharmacist may be based. "Maximum
Allowable Cost List" shall include any term that a pharmacy benefit manager or a
healthcare insurer may use to establish reimbursement rates for generic and
multi-source brand drugs to a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services.
(7)(9) "NDC" means the National Drug Code, a numerical identifier assigned
to all prescription drugs.
Page 2 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
(10) "Person" includes a natural person, corporation, mutual company,
unincorporated association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability
company, trust, estate, foundation, not-for-profit corporation, unincorporated
organization, government or governmental subdivision, or agency.
(8)(11) "Pharmacist" means a licensed pharmacist as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(9)(12) "Pharmacist services" means products, goods, or services provided
as a part of the practice of pharmacy as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(10)(13) "Pharmacy" means any appropriately licensed place where
prescription drugs are dispensed as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(14) "Pharmacy benefit management fee" means a fee that covers the
cost of providing one or more pharmacy benefit management services and that
does not exceed the value of the service or services actually performed by the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(15) "Pharmacy benefit management service" means any of the
following:
(a) Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including negotiating and
contracting for direct or indirect rebates, discounts, or other price concessions.
(b) Managing any aspect of a prescription drug benefit including but not
limited to the processing and payment of claims for prescription drugs, the
performance of drug utilization review, the processing of drug prior
authorization requests, the adjudication of appeals or grievances related to the
prescription drug benefit, contracting with network pharmacies, controlling the
cost of covered prescription drugs, managing or providing data relating to the
prescription drug benefit, or the provision of services related thereto.
(c) Performance of any administrative, managerial, clinical, pricing,
financial, reimbursement, data administration or reporting, or billing service.
(d) Such other services as the commissioner may define by rule or
regulation.
(11)(16) "Pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as the term
Page 3 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
defined in R.S. 22:1641 and includes any person, either directly or indirectly, that
provides one or more pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of an insurer
or health plan, and any agent, contractor, intermediary, affiliate, subsidiary, or
related entity of such person who facilitates, provides, directs, or oversees the
provision of the pharmacy benefit management services.
(12)(17) "Pharmacy benefits plan" or "pharmacy benefits program" means
a plan or program that pays for, reimburses, covers the cost of, or otherwise provides
for pharmacist services to individuals who reside in or are employed in Louisiana.
(18) "Provider" means an individual or entity that furnishes, provides,
dispenses, or administers one or more units of a prescription drug.
(13)(19) "Rebates" means either of the following: all rebates, discounts, and
other price concessions, based on utilization of a prescription drug and paid by the
manufacturer or other party other than an enrollee, directly or indirectly, to the
pharmacy benefit manager after the claim has been adjudicated at the pharmacy.
Rebates shall include a reasonable estimate, as determined by the commissioner, of
any volume-based discount or other discounts.
(a) Negotiated price concessions including but not limited to base price
concessions, whether described as a rebate or otherwise, and reasonable
estimates of any price protection rebates and performance-based price
concessions that may accrue directly or indirectly to the health insurance issuer
or health plan, or other party on behalf of the health insurance issuer or health
plan, including a pharmacy benefit manager, during the coverage year from a
manufacturer, dispensing pharmacy, or other party in connection with the
dispensing or administration of a prescription drug.
(b) Reasonable estimates of any negotiated price concessions, fees, and
other administrative costs that are passed through, or are reasonably
anticipated to be passed through, to the health insurance issuer or health plan
and serve to reduce the health insurance issuer or health plan's liabilities for a
prescription drug.
Page 4 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
(20) "Related entity" means either of the following:
(a) Any entity, whether foreign or domestic, that is a member of any
controlled group of corporations, as defined in Section 1563(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code, except that "fifty percent" shall be substituted for "eighty
percent" wherever the latter percentage appears in the code, of which a
pharmacy benefit manager is a member.
(b) Any of the following persons or entities that are treated as a related
entity to the extent provided in rules adopted by the commissioner:
(i) A person other than a corporation that is treated under the rules as
a related entity of a pharmacy benefit manager.
(ii) A person or entity that is treated under the rules as affiliated with a
pharmacy benefit manager in cases where the pharmacy benefit manager is a
person other than a corporation.
(14)(21) "Specialty drug" means a drug that meets all of the following
criteria:
(a) The drug is used to treat and is prescribed for a person with a complex,
chronic, or rare medical condition that is progressive, can be debilitating or fatal if
left untreated or undertreated, or for which there is no known cure.
(b) The drug is not routinely stocked at a majority of pharmacies within this
state.
(c) The drug has special handling, storage, inventory, or distribution
requirements.
(d) Patients receiving the drug require complex education and treatment
maintenance, such as complex dosing, intensive monitoring, or clinical oversight.
(15)(22) "Spread pricing" means any amount charged or claimed by a
pharmacy benefit manager for a prescription drug that exceeds the amount paid by
the pharmacy benefit manager to the pharmacist or pharmacy for the dispensing of
the prescription drug, minus a pharmacy benefit management fee.
* * *
Page 5 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
§1867.1. PBM Duty; compensation; audits; contract and other requirements
A. PBM Duty
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall owe the pharmacy benefit
manager duty to any enrollee, health plan, or provider that receives pharmacy
benefit management services from the pharmacy benefit manager or that
furnishes, covers, receives, or is administered a unit of a prescription drug for
which the pharmacy benefit manager has provided pharmacy benefit
management services.
(a) Duty to enrollees. The pharmacy benefit manager duty owed to
enrollees shall include duties of care and good faith and fair dealing. The
commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations defining the scope of the duties
owed to enrollees, including by obligating pharmacy benefit managers to
provide all pharmacy benefit management services related to formulary design,
utilization management, and grievances and appeals in a transparent manner
to enrollees that is consistent with the best interest of enrollees and to disclose
all conflicts of interest to enrollees.
(b) Duty to health plans. The pharmacy benefit manager duty owed to
health plans shall include duties of care and good faith and fair dealing. The
commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations defining the scope of the duties
owed to health plans, including by obligating pharmacy benefit managers to
provide transparency to health plans about amounts charged or claimed by the
pharmacy benefit manager in a manner that is adequate to identify all instances
of spread pricing and to disclose all conflicts of interest to health plans.
(c) Duty to providers. The pharmacy benefit manager duty owed to
providers shall include duties of care and good faith and fair dealing. The
commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations defining the scope of the duties
owed to providers, including by obligating pharmacy benefit managers to
provide transparency to providers about amounts charged or claimed by the
pharmacy benefit manager in a manner that is adequate to identify all instances
Page 6 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
of spread pricing and to disclose all conflicts of interest to providers.
(2) Where there is a conflict between the pharmacy benefit manager
duties owed in accordance with this Section, the pharmacy benefit manager
duty owed to an enrollee shall be primary over the duty owed to any other
party, and the pharmacy benefit manager duty owed to a provider shall be
primary over the duty owed to a health plan.
(3) A person who is aggrieved by a violation of this Section may bring a
civil action before a state court of competent jurisdiction against a pharmacy
benefit manager.
B. PBM Compensation
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager may negotiate but shall not retain
rebates and fees, and shall only derive income from pharmacy benefit
management fees for pharmacy benefit management services provided to a
health insurance issuer or health plan in this state. The amount of any
pharmacy benefit management fees shall be set forth in the agreement between
the pharmacy benefit manager and the health insurance issuer or health plan.
(2) Pharmacy benefit management fees charged by or paid to a
pharmacy benefit manager from a health insurance issuer or health plan shall
not be directly or indirectly based or contingent upon any of the following:
(a) The acquisition cost or any other price metric of a drug.
(b) The amount of savings, rebates, or other fees charged, realized, or
collected by or generated based on the activity of the pharmacy benefit
manager.
(c) The amount of premiums, deductibles, or other cost-sharing or fees
charged, realized, or collected by the pharmacy benefit manager from patients
or other persons on behalf of a patient.
(3) Annually by December 31, each pharmacy benefit manager operating
in the state shall certify to the commissioner that it has fully and completely
complied with the requirements of this Subsection throughout the prior
Page 7 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
calendar year. The certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer or
chief financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
C. PBM Audits
(1) The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan
contracted with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the
commissioner may audit the pharmacy benefit manager once per calendar year.
This audit right is in addition to, and shall not be construed to limit, any other
audit rights authorized by law or contract. As part of any audit, the
commissioner, health insurance issuer, or health plan may request information
including but not limited to the any of following:
(a) All reimbursement paid to retail pharmacies, on a claim level, for all
customers of the pharmacy benefit manager in the state, including drug-specific
reimbursement, dispensing fees, all rebates, other fees, ancillary charges,
clawbacks, or adjustments to reimbursement.
(b) Any difference in reimbursement paid to affiliated pharmacies and
unaffiliated pharmacies, including differences in reimbursed ingredient costs
and dispensing fees.
(c) Historical claims data including ingredient cost, quantity, dispensing
fee, sales tax, usual and customary price, channel such as mail or retail, health
insurance issuer or health plan paid amount, days' supply, the amount paid by
the covered individual, formulary tier, acquisition cost, and any administrative
fee associated with the claim, as applicable.
(d) Aggregate rebate amounts received directly or indirectly from
manufacturers, including from any other entity affiliated with or related to the
pharmacy benefit manager that negotiates or contracts with manufacturers,
such as group purchasing organizations and rebate aggregators, by calendar
quarter.
(2) The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide information pursuant
to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection no later than thirty days of its receipt of any
Page 8 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
request from the commissioner, health insurance issuer, or health plan.
(3) The commissioner may dictate the form in which the pharmacy
benefit manager will provide information in response to an audit pursuant to
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(4) The pharmacy benefit manager shall certify that all information
submitted to the commissioner or any health insurance issuer or health plan in
accordance with this Subsection is accurate and complete in all material
respects. The certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer or chief
financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
(5) The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan
contracted with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the
commissioner shall not directly or indirectly publish or otherwise disclose any
confidential, proprietary information, including but not limited to any
information that would reveal the identity of a specific health plan or
manufacturer, the price charged for a specific drug or class of drugs, the
amount of any rebates provided for a specific drug or class of drugs, or that
would otherwise have the potential to compromise the financial, competitive, or
proprietary nature of the information. Any such information shall be protected
as confidential and proprietary information, and is not a public record and is
exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:4.1 et seq.
The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan contracted
with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the commissioner
shall impose the confidentiality protections and requirements of this Paragraph
on any agent or downstream third party that may receive or have access to this
information.
D. PBM Contract and Other Requirements
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager contract with a health insurance issuer
or health plan entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January
1, 2027, shall do both of the following:
Page 9 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337
(a) Specify all forms of revenue, including pharmacy benefit
management fees, to be paid by the health insurance issuer or health plan to the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(b) Acknowledge that spread pricing is not permitted in accordance with
R.S. 22:1867.
E. In addition to any other civil or criminal penalty authorized by law,
a violation of this Section shall be punishable by the commissioner through a
civil monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per claim.
F. In implementing the requirements of this Section, the state shall
regulate a pharmacy benefit manager or health insurance issuer only to the
extent permissible under applicable law.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(11) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(11) R.S. 22:2, 14, 31, 42.1, 88, 244, 263, 265, 461, 550.7, 550.22, 550.29,
550.30, 571, 572, 572.1, 572.2, 574, 601.3, 618, 639, 691.4, 691.5, 691.6, 691.7,
691.8, 691.9, 691.9.1, 691.10, 691.38, 691.56, 732, 752, 753, 771, 834, 972(D), 976,
1008, 1019.2, 1203, 1460, 1464, 1466, 1483.1, 1488, 1546, 1559, 1566(D), 1644,
1656, 1657.1, 1660.7, 1723, 1796, 1801, 1808.3, 1867.1, 1869, 1927, 1929, 1983,
1984, 2036, 2045, 2056, 2085, 2091, 2293, 2303, 2508
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 22:1868.1 is hereby repealed.
Page 10 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-569 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 337